fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Accessoires de bar > Tire-bouchons: Limonadier sommelier; Tire-bouchons à pression d'air; Tire-bouchons électriques; Tire-bouchons à levier; Tire-bouchons de table; Tire-bouchons torsadés; Tire-bouchons de serveur; Tire-bouchons à ailes
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Είδη μπαρ > Τιρμπουσόν: Τιρμπουσόν τύπου Ah-So; Τιρμπουσόν πίεσης αέρα; Ηλεκτρικά τιρμπουσόν; Τιρμπουσόν με μοχλό; Επιτραπέζια τιρμπουσόν; Τιρμπουσόν περιστροφής; Τιρμπουσόν σερβιτόρου; Τιρμπουσόν με φτερά
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Artigos para bar > Saca-rolhas: Saca-rolhas Ah-So; Saca-rolhas de pressão de ar; Saca-rolhas elétricos; Saca-rolhas com manípulo; Saca-rolhas de mesa; Saca-rolhas giratório; Saca-rolhas de empregado de mesa; Saca-rolhas de abas
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Barové nádobí > Vývrtky: Vývrtky typu Ah-So; Vývrtky s tlakem vzduchu; Elektrické vývrtky; Pákové vývrtky; Stolní vývrtky; Klasické vývrtky; Číšnické vývrtky; Vývrtky s křidélkovým systémem
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Baraccessoires > Kurkentrekkers: Ah-So-kurkentrekkers; Kurkentrekers met luchtdruk; Elektrische kurkentrekkers; Hendelkurkentrekkers; Tafelkurkentrekkers; Draaikurkentrekkers; Kelnerskurkentrekkers; Gevleugelde kurkentrekkers
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Oprema za bar > Vadičepi: Vadičepi Ah-So; Pneumatski vadičepi; Električni vadičepi; Vadičepi s polugom; Stolni vadičepi; Rotirajući vadičepi; Konobarski vadičepi; Krilati vadičepi
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Baaritarvikkeet > Korkkiruuvit: Ah-So-korkinvetäjä; Paineilmakorkkiruuvit; Sähköiset korkkiruuvit; Vipukorkkiruuvit; Pöytäkorkkiruuvit; Kierrekorkkiruuvit; Tarjoilijan korkkiruuvit; Siivekkeelliset korkkiruuvit
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Utensilios para bares > Sacacorchos: Sacacorchos de láminas; Sacacorchos de presión de aire; Sacacorchos eléctricos; Sacacorchos de palanca; Sacacorchos de mesa; Sacacorchos giratorios; Sacacorchos para camareros; Sacacorchos alados
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > バー用品 > コルク抜き: 二本爪コルク抜き; 空気圧コルク抜き; 電動コルク抜き; レバー式コルク抜き; 卓上コルク抜き; ツイスト式コルク抜き; ウェイター用コルク抜き; ウィング式コルク抜き
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Đồ uống rượu > Đồ khui: Đồ khui rượu vang Ah-So; Đồ khui rượu vang bằng áp suất khí; Đồ khui điện; Đồ khui đòn bẩy; Đồ khui rượu vang để bàn; Đồ khui vặn; Đồ khui rượu vang; Đồ khui có cánh
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Bartillbehör > Korkskruvar: Ah-So-korkskruvar; Lufttryckskorkskruvar; Elektriska korkskruvar; Hävarmskorkskruvar; Bordskorkskruvar; Vridkorkskruvar; Servitörskorkskruvar; Vingade korkskruvar
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 酒吧酒具 > 红酒开瓶器: 双叉开瓶器; 气压开瓶器; 电动开瓶器; 手握式开瓶器; 桌面开瓶器; 扭转开瓶器; 服务员开瓶器; 翼形开瓶器
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Оборудване за барове > Тирбушони: Ах-Со тирбушони; Пневматични тирбушони; Електрически тирбушони; Тирбушони с лост; Настолни тирбушони; Въртящи се тирбушони; Сервитьорски тирбушони; Тирбушони с крила
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Barska oprema > Odpirači za steklenice: Ah-So odpirači; Odpirači na zračni tlak; Električni odpirači za steklenice; Odpirači za steklenice z vzvodom; Namizni odpirači; Odpirači za steklenice z vrtilnim mehanizmom; Odpirači za steklenice na ključ; Odpirači za buteljke
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Articole de bar > Tirbușoane: Tirbușoane cu două brațe pentru dopuri vechi; Tirbușoane cu pompă de aer; Tirbușoane electrice; Tirbușoane cu pârghie; Tirbușoane de masă; Tirbușoane cu rotire; Tirbușoane pentru ospătari; Tirbușoane cu manete laterale
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 바 용품 > 코르크스크루: 아쏘 코르크스크루; 공기압 코르크스크루; 전기 코르크스크루; 레버 코르크스크루; 테이블형 코르크스크루; 트위스트 코르크스크루; 웨이터 코르크스크루; 윙 코르크스크루
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Naczynia barowe > Korkociągi: Korkociągi Ah-So; Korkociągi ciśnieniowe; Korkociągi elektryczne; Korkociągi z dźwignią; Korkociągi blatowe; Korkociągi skręcane; Korkociągi kelnerskie; Korkociągi motylkowe
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Utensílios para bares > Saca-rolhas: Saca-rolhas Ah-So; Saca-rolhas por pressão de ar; Saca-rolhas elétricos; Saca-rolhas de alavanca; Saca-rolhas de mesa; Saca-rolhas de torção; Saca-rolhas de garçom; Saca-rolhas com asas
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Bar-Utensilien > Korkenzieher: Spangenkorkenzieher; Luftdruck-Korkenzieher; Elektrische Korkenzieher; Hebelkorkenzieher; Tischkorkenzieher; T-Korkenzieher; Kellnermesser; Flügelkorkenzieher
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Pomôcky na prípravu miešaných nápojov > Vývrtky: Vývrtky; Tlakové vývrtky; Elektrické vývrtky; Pákové vývrtky; Stolové vývrtky; Otočné vývrtky; Čašnícke vývrtky; Krídlové vývrtky
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > İçki Takımları > Tirbuşonlar: Klasik Tirbuşonlar; Hava Basınçlı Tirbuşonlar; Elektrikli Tirbuşonlar; Kollu Tirbuşonlar; Masa Üstü Tirbuşonlar; Helezon Tirbuşon; Garson Tirbuşonları; Kanatlı Tirbuşon
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Барная посуда > Штопоры: Штопоры Ah-So; Штопоры с воздушным давлением; Электрические штопоры; Рычажные штопоры; Настольные штопоры; Вращательные шторы; Штопоры официанта; Штопоры-бабочки
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Bárfelszerelés > Dugóhúzók: Ah-So dugóhúzók; Légnyomásos dugóhúzók; Elektromos dugóhúzók; Karos dugóhúzók; Asztali dugóhúzók; Csavaros dugóhúzók; Pincérdugóhúzók; Szárnyas dugóhúzók
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 吧檯用具 > 軟木塞開瓶器: 老酒開瓶器; 氣壓式開瓶器; 電動開瓶器; 槓桿開瓶器; 桌上型開瓶器; 扭轉開瓶器; 兩段式開瓶器; 多功能開瓶器
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Barware > Corkscrews: Ah-So Corkscrews; Air Pressure Corkscrews; Electric Corkscrews; Lever Corkscrews; Tabletop Corkscrews; Twist Corkscrews; Waiter's Corkscrews; Winged Corkscrews
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Baro reikmenys > Kamščiatraukiai: Ah-So kamščiatraukiai; Oro slėgio kamščiatraukiai; Elektriniai kamščiatraukiai; Svirtiniai kamščiatraukiai; Staliniai kamščiatraukiai; Sukami kamščiatraukius; Padavėjų kamščiatraukiai; Sparnuotieji kamščiatraukiai
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Barutstyr > Korketrekkere: Ah-So korketrekkere; Lufttrykkskorketrekkere; Elektriske korketrekkere; Spakkorketrekkere; Bordkorketrekkere; Skrukorketrekkere; Kelnerkorketrekkere; Vingekorketrekkere
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Materiale da bar > Cavatappi: Cavatappi Ah-So; Cavatappi ad aria compressa; Cavatappi elettrici; Cavatappi a leva; Cavatappi da tavolo; Cavatappi a torsione; Cavatappi per cameriere; Cavatappi con ali
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Barudstyr > Proptrækkere: Ah-So-proptrækkere; Lufttryksproptrækkere; Elektriske proptrækkere; Proptrækkere med håndtag; Proptrækkere til bordet; Vrideproptrækkere; Tjenerproptrækkere; Bevingede proptrækkere
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้กับบาร์ > ที่เปิดขวดไวน์: ที่เปิดไวน์แบบตะเกียบ; ที่เปิดขวดไวน์แบบใช้แรงดันอากาศ; ที่เปิดขวดไฟฟ้า; ที่เปิดขวดแบบก้านโยก; ที่เปิดขวดไวน์แบบตั้งโต๊ะ; ที่เปิดขวดแบบบิด; ที่เปิดขวดแบบบริกร; ที่เปิดขวดแบบสกรูปีกนก